Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
PART 4
TRIAL PROCEEDINGS

16-10-401. Trials - authority to exclude victim's advocate from sequestration orders.

Notwithstanding any sequestration order entered by the court that excludes members of the general public from a jury trial or a trial before the court, the court may allow a victim's advocate to remain in the courtroom during such trial. For the purposes of this section, "victim's advocate" means any person whose regular or volunteer duties include the support of an alleged victim of physical or sexual abuse or assault.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire part added, p. 322, § 2, effective July 1.

16-10-402. Use of closed-circuit television - child or witness with intellectual and developmental disabilities.

When a witness at the time of a trial is a child less than twelve years of age, or is a person who has an intellectual and developmental disability as defined in section 25.5-10-202, C.R.S., the court may, upon motion of a party or upon its own motion, order that the witness's testimony be taken in a room other than the courtroom and be televised by closed-circuit television in the courtroom if:

The testimony is taken during the proceeding;

The judge determines that testimony by the witness in the courtroom and in the presence of the defendant would result in the witness suffering serious emotional distress or trauma such that the witness would not be able to reasonably communicate; and

Closed-circuit television equipment is available for such use.

To obtain an order authorizing the use of closed-circuit television for testimony by a child or developmentally disabled witness, the party shall file a written motion with the court no less than fourteen days prior to the trial.

Only the prosecuting attorney, the attorney for the defendant, the guardian ad litem, if any, and the judge may question the witness when he or she testifies by closed-circuit television.

The operators of the closed-circuit television equipment shall make every effort to be unobtrusive while the witness is testifying.

Only the following persons may be in the room with the witness when the child or developmentally disabled person testifies by closed-circuit television:

The prosecuting attorney;

The attorney for the defendant;

The guardian ad litem, if any;

The operators of the closed-circuit television equipment;

A person whose presence, in the opinion of the court, contributes to the welfare and well-being of the witness, including a person who has dealt with the witness in a therapeutic setting; and

The jury.

During the witness's testimony by closed-circuit television, the judge and the defendant, if present, shall remain in the courtroom.

The judge and the defendant shall be allowed to communicate with the persons in the room where the witness is testifying by an appropriate electronic method.

The provisions of this section shall not apply if the defendant is appearing pro se.

This section shall not be interpreted to preclude, for purposes of identification of a defendant, the presence of both the witness and the defendant in the courtroom at the same time.

Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to preclude the removal of the defendant, rather than the witness, from the courtroom upon the stipulation of both parties and the approval of the court.

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire section added, p. 424, § 4, effective April 29.

L. 2012:

(1)(b) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 853, § 83, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

IP(1)(a) amended, (HB 13-1314), ch. 323, p. 1804, § 28, effective March 1, 2014.

16-10-403. Option to close court.

The court may, if it determines that the best interest of a child in a closed proceeding overrides the public interest in an open criminal proceeding and the defendant's right to a public trial, close the court to the public when images of sexually exploitative materials or forensic interviews directly related to said child are being presented as evidence in court and the child or the forensic interviewer is on the witness stand.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (SB 13-198), ch. 279, p. 1452, § 1, effective May 24.

16-10-404. Use of a court facility dog - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Court facility dog" means a dog that is a graduate of an assistance dog organization that is accredited by an internationally recognized organization whose main purpose is to grant accreditation to assistance dog organizations based on standards of excellence in all areas of assistance dog acquisition, training, and placement. A "court facility dog" must be specially trained to provide support to witnesses testifying in proceedings without causing a distraction.

"Criminal proceeding" or "criminal proceedings" has the same meaning as set forth in section 16-8.5-101 (8).

"Qualified individual with a disability" has the same meaning as set forth in the federal "Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990", 42 U.S.C. sec. 12101 et seq., and its related amendments and implementing regulations.

"Service animal" has the same meaning as set forth in the implementing regulations of Title II and Title III of the federal "Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990", 42 U.S.C. sec. 12101 et seq.

The court may, upon motion of a party or upon its own motion, order that a witness's testimony be offered while a court facility dog is in the courtroom during the testimony of the witness if:

The testimony is taken during a criminal proceeding; and

The judge determines by a preponderance of the evidence that:

The presence of a court facility dog with the witness during the witness's testimony would reduce the witness's anxiety and enhance the ability of the court to receive full and accurate testimony;

The arrangements for an available court facility dog during the witness's testimony would not interfere with efficient criminal proceedings; and

No prejudice would result to any party due to the presence of a court facility dog with the witness.

To obtain an order authorizing the use of a court facility dog during the witness's testimony, the party must file a written motion with the court no less than fourteen days prior to the criminal proceeding.

Notwithstanding a judge's order granting that the witness's testimony may be offered while a court facility dog is present pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section, the judge has the authority to terminate the presence of a court facility dog at any time prior to, or during, the witness's testimony.

To ensure that the presence of a court facility dog does not influence the jury or is not a reflection on the truthfulness of any testimony that is offered by a witness, the court may instruct the jury, if a jury instruction is requested by a party who objected to the presence of the court facility dog or upon agreement of the parties, on the role of the court facility dog and that the court facility dog is a trained animal.

Nothing in this section precludes or interferes with the rights of a qualified individual with a disability who is accompanied by a service animal pursuant to state or federal law.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (HB 19-1220), ch. 138, p. 1739, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2020:

(1)(b) amended, (HB 20-1402), ch. 216, p. 1046, § 27, effective June 30.